Utah statutes.
17-21-11.   Notice given by recording.

(1)  Each certified copy from the time of recording gives notice to all persons of the contents of the recorded document.

(2)  Subsequent purchasers, mortgagees, and lien holders purchase and encumber with the same notice and effect as if the certified copy was the original document.



Amended by Chapter 85, 1999 General Session

